Nebraska, session 109, LB1180.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 75-118, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-118 The commission shall:
(1) Until July 1, 2021, fix all necessary rates, charges, and
regulations governing and regulating the transportation, storage, or
handling of household goods by any common carrier in Nebraska intrastate
commerce;
(1) (2) Fix all necessary rates, charges, and regulations governing
and regulating the transportation of passengers by any common carrier in
Nebraska intrastate commerce;
(3) Until July 1, 2021, make all necessary classifications of
household goods that may be transported, stored, or handled by any common
carrier in Nebraska intrastate commerce, such classifications applying to
and being the same for all common carriers;
(2) (4) Authorize the transportation of (a) household goods under a
license issued pursuant to section 75-304.03 or (b) employees of a
railroad carrier under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.04;
(3) (5) Prevent and correct the unjust discriminations set forth in
section 75-126;
(4) (6) Enforce all statutes and commission regulations pertaining
to rates and, if necessary, institute actions in the appropriate court of
any county in which the common carrier involved operates except actions
instituted pursuant to sections 75-140 and 75-156 to 75-158. All suits
shall be brought and penalties recovered in the name of the state by or
under the direction of the Attorney General; and
(5) (7) Enforce the Major Oil Pipeline Siting Act and the State
Natural Gas Regulation Act; and .
(6) Issue licenses that authorize intrastate medicaid nonemergency
medical transportation services pursuant to section 75-311.
Sec. 2. Section 75-126, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
75-126 (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no common
carrier shall:
(a) Charge, demand, collect, or receive from any person a greater or
lesser compensation for any services rendered than it charges, demands,
collects, or receives from any other person for doing a like or
contemporaneous service;
(b) Make or give any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage
to any particular person;
(c) Subject any type of traffic to any undue or unreasonable
prejudice, delay, or disadvantage in any respect whatsoever;
(d) Charge or receive any greater compensation in the aggregate for
the transportation of a like kind of property or passengers for a shorter
than for a longer distance over the same line or route, except as the
commission may prescribe in special cases to prevent manifest injuries,
except that no manifest injustice shall be imposed upon any person at
intermediate points. This section shall not prevent the commission from
making group or emergency rates;
(e) Demand, charge, or collect, by any device whatsoever, a lesser
or greater compensation for any service rendered than that filed with or
prescribed by the commission; or
(f) Change any rate, schedule, or classification in any manner
whatsoever before application has been made to the commission and
permission granted for that purpose, except as otherwise provided in
section 86-155.
(2) This section shall not prohibit any common carrier from, and a
common carrier shall not be subject to any fine, penalty, or forfeiture
for, performing services free or at reduced rates to:
(a) The United States, the State of Nebraska, or any governmental
subdivision thereof;
(b) The employees, both present and retired, of such common carrier;
(c) Any person when the object is to provide relief in case of any
-3-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
disaster;
(d) Any person who transports property for charitable purposes;
(e) Ministers and others giving their entire time to religious or
charitable work;
(f) Any person who is legally blind or visually handicapped; or
(g) Any person who is sixty-five years of age or older.
(3) The rates for services that are provided by motor carriers and
regulated motor carriers as defined in section 75-302 are not subject to
regulation by the Public Service Commission for any rate that is
determined by an agreement with a state agency.
Sec. 3. Section 75-302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-302 For purposes of sections 75-301 to 75-343 and in all rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the commission pursuant to
such sections, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Attended services means an attendant or caregiver accompanying a
minor or a person who has a physical, mental, or developmental disability
and is unable to travel or wait without assistance or supervision;
(2) Carrier enforcement division means the carrier enforcement
division of the Nebraska State Patrol or the Nebraska State Patrol;
(3) Certificate means a certificate of public convenience and
necessity issued under Chapter 75, article 3, to common carriers by motor
vehicle;
(4) Civil penalty means any monetary penalty assessed by the
commission or carrier enforcement division due to a violation of Chapter
75, article 3, or section 75-126 as such section applies to any person or
carrier specified in Chapter 75, article 3; any term, condition, or
limitation of any certificate or permit issued pursuant to Chapter 75,
article 3; or any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, the
Division of Motor Carrier Services, or the carrier enforcement division
issued pursuant to Chapter 75, article 3;
-4-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
(5) Commission means the Public Service Commission;
(6) Common carrier means any person who or which undertakes to
transport passengers or, until July 1, 2021, household goods, for the
general public in intrastate commerce by motor vehicle for hire, whether
over regular or irregular routes, upon the highways of this state. Common
Beginning July 1, 2021, common carrier does not include:
(a) A a motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to
section 75-304.03; and
(b) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid
nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was
issued pursuant to section 75-311.
(7) Contract carrier means any motor carrier that which transports
passengers or, until July 1, 2021, household goods, for hire other than
as a common carrier designed to meet the distinct needs of each
individual customer or a specifically designated class of customers
without any limitation as to the number of customers it can serve within
the class. Contract Beginning on January 1, 2021, contract carrier does
not include:
(a) A a motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to
section 75-304.04; and
(b) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid
nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was
issued pursuant to section 75-311.
(8) Division of Motor Carrier Services means the Division of Motor
Carrier Services of the Department of Motor Vehicles;
(9) Highway means the roads, highways, streets, and ways in this
state;
(10) Household goods means personal effects and property used or to
be used in a dwelling, when a part of the equipment or supply of such
dwelling, and similar property as the commission may provide by
regulation if the transportation of such effects or property, is:
-5-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
(a) Arranged and paid for by the householder, including
transportation of property from a factory or store when the property is
purchased by the householder with the intent to use in his or her
dwelling; or
(b) Arranged and paid for by another party;
(11) Intrastate commerce means commerce between any place in this
state and any other place in this state and not in part through any other
state;
(12) License means a license issued to a motor carrier engaged in
the for-hire, intrastate transportation of:
(a) Household (a) household goods under section 75-304.03; or
(b) Employees employees of a railroad carrier engaged in interstate
commerce to or from their work locations under section 75-304.04; or
(c) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid
nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was
issued pursuant to section 75-311.
(13) Licensed care transportation services means transportation
provided by an entity licensed by the Department of Health and Human
Services as a residential child-caring agency as defined in section
71-1926 or child-placing agency as defined in section 71-1926 or a child
care facility licensed under the Child Care Licensing Act to a client of
the entity or facility when the person providing transportation services
also assists and supervises the passenger or, if the client is a minor,
to a family member of a minor when it is necessary for agency or facility
staff to accompany or facilitate the transportation in order to provide
necessary services and support to the minor. Licensed care transportation
services must be incidental to and in furtherance of the social services
provided by the entity or facility to the transported client;
(14) Motor carrier means any person other than a regulated motor
carrier who or which owns, controls, manages, operates, or causes to be
operated any motor vehicle used to transport passengers or property over
-6-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
any public highway in this state;
(15) Motor vehicle means any vehicle, machine, tractor, trailer, or
semitrailer propelled or drawn by mechanical power and used upon the
highways in the transportation of passengers or property but does not
include any vehicle, locomotive, or car operated exclusively on a rail or
rails;
(16) Permit means a permit issued under Chapter 75, article 3, to
contract carriers by motor vehicle;
(17) Person means any individual, firm, partnership, limited
liability company, corporation, company, association, or joint-stock
association and includes any trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal
representative thereof;
(18) Private carrier means any motor carrier which owns, controls,
manages, operates, or causes to be operated a motor vehicle to transport
passengers or property to or from its facility, plant, or place of
business or to deliver to purchasers its products, supplies, or raw
materials (a) when such transportation is within the scope of and
furthers a primary business of the carrier other than transportation and
(b) when not for hire. Nothing in sections 75-301 to 75-322 shall apply
to private carriers;
(19) Regulated motor carrier means any person who or which owns,
controls, manages, operates, or causes to be operated any motor vehicle
used to transport passengers, other than those excepted under section
75-303, or, until July 1, 2021, household goods, over any public highway
in this state. Regulated Beginning July 1, 2021, regulated motor carrier
does not include:
(a) A a motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to
section 75-304.03; .
(b) A Beginning on January 1, 2021, regulated motor carrier does not
include a motor carrier operating under a license issued pursuant to
section 75-304.04; and
-7-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
(c) A motor carrier that is engaged in intrastate medicaid
nonemergency medical transportation services under a license that was
issued pursuant to section 75-311.
(20) Residential care means care for a minor or a person who is
physically, mentally, or developmentally disabled who resides in a
residential home or facility regulated by the Department of Health and
Human Services, including, but not limited to, a foster home, treatment
facility, residential child-caring agency, or shelter;
(21) Residential care transportation services means transportation
services to persons in residential care when such residential care
transportation services and residential care are provided as part of a
services contract with the Department of Health and Human Services or
pursuant to a subcontract entered into incident to a services contract
with the department;
(22) Supported transportation services means transportation services
to a minor or for a person who is physically, mentally, or
developmentally disabled when the person providing transportation
services also assists and supervises the passenger or transportation
services to a family member of a minor when it is necessary for provider
staff to accompany or facilitate the transportation in order to provide
necessary services and support to the minor. Supported transportation
services must be provided as part of a services contract with the
Department of Health and Human Services or pursuant to a subcontract
entered into incident to a services contract with the department, and the
driver must meet department requirements for (a) training or experience
working with minors or persons who are physically, mentally, or
developmentally disabled, (b) training with regard to the specific needs
of the client served, (c) reporting to the department, and (d) age.
Assisting and supervising the passenger shall not necessarily require the
person providing transportation services to stay with the passenger after
the transportation services have been provided; and
-8-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
(23) Transportation network company has the definition found in
section 75-323. A transportation network company shall not own, control,
operate, or manage drivers' personal vehicles.
Sec. 4. Section 75-303.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-303.01 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services, a
medicaid-managed care organization under contract with the department, or
another agent working on the department's behalf may contract for
nonemergency medical transportation for medicaid clients with a motor
carrier or regulated motor carrier holding:
(a) A a designation of authority issued pursuant to subsection (3)
of section 75-311 to provide medicaid nonemergency medical transportation
services; or
(b) A license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311 to engage
in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services. that
has been authorized to provide such services by the commission prior to
April 28, 2017.
(2) While operating under such a designation of authority or such
license issued pursuant to subsection (3) of section 75-311, a motor
carrier or regulated motor carrier shall comply with:
(a) The the requirements of the Department of Health and Human
Services to protect the safety and well-being of department clients,
including training, driver standards, background checks, and the
provision and quality of service; and
(b) The the rules and regulations adopted, promulgated, and enforced
by the commission governing insurance requirements, equipment standards,
and background checks.
Sec. 5. Section 75-303.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-303.02 (1) The Department of Health and Human Services or any
agency organized under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act may
-9-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
contract for the transportation of clients with a contractor which does
not hold a certificate or which is not otherwise exempt under section
75-303 only if:
(a) The proposed contractor is the individual who will personally
drive the vehicle in question;
(b) The only compensation to the contractor for the transportation
is paid by the department at a rate no greater than that provided for
reimbursement of state employees pursuant to section 81-1176 for the
costs incurred in the transportation; and
(c)(i) There is no regulated motor carrier serving the area in which
the client needs transportation, (ii) the regulated motor carrier serving
the area is incapable of providing the specific service in question by
its own written statement or as determined by the commission upon
application of the regulated motor carrier or the department, or (iii)
the regulated carrier cannot or will not provide such service at the rate
specified in subsection (2) of section 75-303.03.
(2) This section does not apply to a motor carrier or regulated
motor carrier holding:
(a) A a designation of authority issued pursuant to subsection (3)
of section 75-311; or .
(b) A license that was issued pursuant to section 75-311 to engage
in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services.
Sec. 6. Section 75-303.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
75-303.03 (1) The commission, in consultation with the Department of
Health and Human Services, shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations governing minimum liability insurance requirements, equipment
standards, driver qualification requirements, and the issuance and filing
of notice for any contractor utilized by the department or any agency
organized under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act pursuant to
section 75-303.02.
-10-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services or any agency
organized under the Nebraska Community Aging Services Act shall reimburse
common and contract carriers for transportation of passengers at a rate
not to exceed the rate of reimbursement pursuant to section 81-1176
multiplied by three. The maximum reimbursement rate provided for in this
subsection shall not apply when the carrier (a) transports such person
wholly within the corporate limits of the city or village where the
transportation of the person originated, (b) transports a disabled person
as defined by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 in a
vehicle that is compliant with the regulations providing for the
transportation of such disabled person, or (c) provides nonemergency
medical transportation of medicaid clients pursuant to subsection (3) of
section 75-311.
(3)(a) (3) Rates for the following nonemergency medical
transportation service providers are not subject to regulation by the
commission:
(i) Any holder of with a designation of authority that was issued
pursuant to subsection (3) of section 75-311 are not subject to
commission regulation; , and
(ii) Any holder of a license that was issued pursuant to section
75-311 to engage in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical
transportation services.
(b) Regulated regulated motor carriers with such a designation
reimbursed under this section are not subject to commission rate
regulation for such reimbursement rates.
(4)(a) The Department of Health and Human Services may reimburse an
individual for the costs incurred by such individual in the
transportation of a person eligible to receive transportation services
through the department if:
(i) The individual is under contract with the department and
provides transportation to the eligible person; and
-11-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
(ii) The eligible person has chosen the individual to provide the
transportation.
(b) The department shall reimburse for the costs incurred in the
transportation at a rate no greater than that provided for reimbursement
of state employees pursuant to section 81-1176.
(c) Transportation provided to an eligible person by an individual
pursuant to this section does not constitute transportation for hire.
(d) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
implement this subsection.
Sec. 7. Section 75-307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
75-307 (1)(a) The following motor carriers and regulated motor
carriers shall comply with the rules and regulations described in
subdivision (b) of this subsection: (1) Certificated intrastate motor
carriers,
(i) Common including common and contract carriers; ,
(ii) Any any motor carrier transporting household goods under a
license issued pursuant to section 75-304.03; ,
(iii) Any and any motor carrier transporting employees of a railroad
carrier under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.04; and
(iv) Any holder of a license that was issued pursuant to section
75-311 to engage in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical
transportation services, and any applicant for such license.
(b) The commission may adopt and promulgate shall comply with
reasonable rules and regulations prescribed by the commission governing
the filing with the commission, the approval of the filings, and the
maintenance of proof at such carrier's principal place of business of
surety bonds, policies of insurance, qualifications as a self-insurer, or
other securities or agreements, in such reasonable amount as required by
the commission, conditioned to pay, within the amount of such surety
bonds, policies of insurance, qualifications as a self-insurer, or other
-12-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
securities or agreements, any final judgment recovered against such motor
carrier for bodily injuries to or the death of any person resulting from
the negligent operation, maintenance, or use of motor vehicles under such
certificate, permit, or license or for loss or damage to property of
others.
(c)(i) Any No certificate, or permit, or license shall not be issued
to any of the following that does not comply with this section or the
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated pursuant to this section:
(A) Any a common or contract carrier;
(B) Any , no license shall be issued to a motor carrier transporting
household goods under section 75-304.03;
(C) Any motor carrier transporting or employees of a railroad
carrier under section 75-304.04; or ,
(D) Any applicant for a license to engage in intrastate medicaid
nonemergency medical transportation services pursuant to section 75-311.
(ii) Any nor shall such certificate, permit, or license described in
this subdivision (c) that has been issued shall not remain in force
unless the such carrier complies with this section and the rules and
regulations adopted and promulgated prescribed by the commission pursuant
to this section.
(2)(a) The following motor carriers shall comply with the rules and
regulations described in subdivision (b) of this subsection: (2) The
commission may, in its discretion and under its rules and regulations,
require
(i) Any any certificated carrier;
(ii) Any , any motor carrier transporting household goods under a
license issued pursuant to section 75-304.03;
(iii) Any , and any motor carrier transporting employees of a
railroad carrier under a license issued pursuant to section 75-304.04;
and
(iv) Any holder of a license that was issued pursuant to section
-13-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
75-311 to engage in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical
transportation services.
(b) The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
that require the motor carriers described in subdivision (a) of this
subsection to file a surety bond, policies of insurance, qualifications
as a self-insurer, or other securities or agreements, in a sum to be
determined by the commission, to be conditioned upon such carrier making
compensation to shippers or consignees for all property belonging to
shippers or consignees and coming into the possession of such carrier in
connection with its transportation service.
(c) Any motor carrier that is which may be required by law to
compensate a shipper or consignee for any loss, damage, or default for
which a connecting motor common carrier is legally responsible shall be
subrogated to the rights of such shipper or consignee under any such
bond, policies of insurance, or other securities or agreements to the
extent of the sum so paid.
(3) In carrying out this section, the commission may classify motor
carriers and regulated motor carriers taking into consideration the
hazards of the operations of such carriers and the value of the household
goods carried. Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to
authorize the commission to compel motor carriers other than those
transporting household goods under section 75-309 or under a license
issued pursuant to section 75-304.03 to carry cargo insurance.
(4) This section does not apply to transportation network companies.
Sec. 8. Section 75-311, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
75-311 (1)(a) A certificate shall be issued to any qualified
applicant authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by
the application if it is found after notice and hearing that (i) the
applicant is fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service
proposed and to conform to the provisions of sections 75-301 to 75-322
-14-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
and the requirements, rules, and regulations of the commission under such
sections and (ii) the proposed service, to the extent to be authorized by
the certificate, whether regular or irregular, is or will be required by
the present or future public convenience and necessity. Otherwise the
application shall be denied.
(b) The burden shall be on the applicant to show (i) that they are
fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service proposed and to
conform to the provisions of sections 75-301 to 75-322 and the
requirements, rules, and regulations of the commission and (ii) that the
proposed service will be responsive to a public demand or need.
(c) The burden shall be on any protestant to the application to show
that (i) existing carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the
proposed need and (ii) that even if the applicant's service will be
responsive to a public demand or need, that applicant would not be able
to serve this need in a specified manner without endangering or impairing
the operations of existing carriers contrary to the public interest.
(2)(a) A permit shall be issued to any qualified applicant therefor
authorizing in whole or in part the operations covered by the application
if it appears after notice and hearing from the application or from any
hearing held on the application that (i) the applicant is fit, willing,
and able properly to perform the service of a contract carrier by motor
vehicle and to conform to the provisions of such sections and the lawful
requirements, rules, and regulations of the commission under such
sections and (ii) the proposed operation, to the extent authorized by the
permit, will be consistent with the public interest by providing services
designed to meet the distinct needs of each individual customer or a
specifically designated class of customers as described defined in
subdivision (7) of section 75-302. Otherwise the application shall be
denied.
(b) Prior to January 1, 2027, for For a designation of authority to
provide medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services pursuant to
-15-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
a contract with (i) the Department of Health and Human Services, (ii) a
medicaid-managed care organization under contract with the department, or
(iii) another agent working on the department's behalf as provided under
section 75-303.01, in determining whether the authorization will be
consistent with the public interest, the commission shall consult with
the Director of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid
and Long-Term Care of the department or his or her designee.
(3)(a) This subsection applies prior to January 1, 2027.
(b) (3)(a) A designation of authority shall be issued to any
regulated motor carrier holding a certificate under subsection (1) of
this section or a permit under subsection (2) of this section authorizing
such carrier to provide medicaid nonemergency medical transportation
services pursuant to a contract with (i) the Department of Health and
Human Services, (ii) a medicaid-managed care organization under contract
with the department, or (iii) another agent working on the department's
behalf as provided under section 75-303.01, if it is found after notice
and hearing from the application or from any hearing held on the
application that the authorization is or will be required by the present
or future convenience and necessity to serve the distinct needs of
medicaid clients.
(c) (b) The burden shall be on the applicant to show that the
proposed service will be responsive to a public demand or need. The
burden shall be on any protestant to the application to show that (i)
existing carriers are currently meeting, or will meet, the proposed need
and (ii) that even if the applicant's service will be responsive to a
public demand or need, that applicant would not be able to serve this
need in a specified manner without endangering or impairing the
operations of existing carriers contrary to the public interest.
(d) (c) In determining whether the authorization is or will be
required by the present or future convenience and necessity to serve the
distinct needs of medicaid clients, the commission shall consult with the
-16-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
Director of Medicaid and Long-Term Care of the Division of Medicaid and
Long-Term Care of the department or his or her designee.
(4)(a) Beginning January 1, 2027, a person shall not engage in
intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services with any
of the following prior to being issued a license for such purpose by the
commission:
(i) The Department of Health and Human Services;
(ii) A medicaid-managed care organization under contract with the
Department of Health and Human Services; or
(iii) Any agent working on behalf of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(b) Any person may apply to the commission for a license to engage
in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services on a
form prescribed by the commission. The commission may approve any such
application if the commission determines that the applicant meets the
following qualifications:
(i) The applicant is fit, willing, and able to properly perform
intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services; and
(ii) The applicant is able to conform to sections 75-301 to 75-322
and the rules and regulations that are adopted and promulgated by the
commission under such sections.
(c) Prior to issuing a license to engage in intrastate medicaid
nonemergency medical transportation services, the commission may hold a
hearing to determine if the applicant meets the qualifications described
in subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(d) A license to engage in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical
transportation services is valid for one year. Any such license may be
renewed annually.
(e) The fee for a license or renewal of a license shall be
established by the commission, but shall not exceed two hundred fifty
dollars. Such fee shall accompany the application for such license or
-17-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
renewal of such license.
(f) The commission may suspend or revoke any license to engage in
intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services of any
person if such person does not comply with section 75-307, any rule or
regulation that is adopted and promulgated by the commission, or any
lawful order of the commission. Any such suspension or revocation is not
valid unless the commission:
(i) Provides to such person a written notice that describes such
suspension or revocation. Such written notice shall be provided at least
fifteen days prior to the hearing described in subdivision (f)(ii) of
this subsection; and
(ii) Holds a hearing to determine if such license shall be suspended
or revoked. Such person is not required to be present at the hearing.
(g) Except for a transportation network company holding a permit
under section 75-324, any person that is issued a license to engage in
intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation services shall
comply with section 75-307.
(5) Subsections (1) through (3) of this (4) This section shall not
apply to transportation network companies holding a permit under section
75-324 or operations pursuant to a contract authorized by sections
75-303.02 and 75-303.03.
Sec. 9. Section 75-342, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
75-342 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, no No transportation network company or participating driver
shall provide transportation for any person under contract with the
Department of Health and Human Services or any contractors of the
Department of Health and Human Services without specific authorization
from the commission. The commission shall grant specific authorization to
a requesting transportation network company or participating driver,
unless a protestant shows that (a) (1) existing carriers are currently
-18-

LB1180 LB1180
2026 2026
meeting, or will meet, the proposed need for the proposed service and (b)
(2) that even if the applicant's service will be responsive to a public
demand or need, that applicant would not be able to serve this need in a
specified manner without endangering or impairing the operations of
existing carriers contrary to the public interest.
(2) No transportation network company or participating driver shall
engage in intrastate medicaid nonemergency medical transportation
services unless such transportation network company or participating
driver holds a license to engage in such services under section 75-311.
Sec. 10. Original sections 75-303.01, 75-303.02, and 75-303.03,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, sections 75-118, 75-302, and
75-307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and sections
75-126, 75-311, and 75-342, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, are
repealed.
-19-